Missouri, session 2026, SB989.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 290.502, RSMo, is repealed and twenty-
six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 290.502, 290.601, 290.604, 290.605, 290.607, 290.609,
290.610, 290.612, 290.613, 290.615, 290.616, 290.619, 290.621,
290.622, 290.625, 290.627, 290.628, 290.630, 290.631, 290.633,
290.634, 290.636, 290.637, 290.639, 290.640, and 290.643, to
read as follows:
290.502. 1. Except as may be otherwise provided
pursuant to sections 290.500 to 290.530, effective January
1, 2007, every employer shall pay to each employee wages at
the rate of $6.50 per hour, or wages at the same rate or
rates set under the provisions of federal law as the
prevailing federal minimum wage applicable to those covered
jobs in interstate commerce, whichever rate per hour is
higher.
2. The minimum wage shall be increased or decreased on
January 1, 2008, and on January 1 of successive years [but
ending December 31, 2024], by the increase or decrease in
the cost of living. On September 30, 2007, and on each
September 30 of each successive year [but ending December
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 989 2
31, 2024], the director shall measure the increase or
decrease in the cost of living by the percentage increase or
decrease as of the preceding July over the level as of July
of the immediately preceding year of the Consumer Price
Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) or
successor index as published by the U.S. Department of Labor
or its successor agency, with the amount of the minimum wage
increase or decrease rounded to the nearest five cents.
3. Except as may be otherwise provided pursuant to
sections 290.500 to 290.530, and notwithstanding subsection
1 of this section, effective January 1, 2025, every employer
shall pay to each employee wages at the rate of not less
than $13.75 per hour, or wages at the same rate or rates set
under the provisions of federal law as the prevailing
federal minimum wage applicable to those covered jobs in
interstate commerce, whichever rate per hour is higher.
Thereafter, the minimum wage established by this subsection
shall be increased by $1.25 per hour, to $15.00 per hour,
effective January 1, 2026. Thereafter, the minimum wage
established by this subsection shall be increased or
decreased on January 1, 2027, and on January first of
successive years, per the method set forth in subsection 2
of this section. If at any time the federal minimum wage
rate is above or is thereafter increased above the minimum
wage then in effect under this subsection, the minimum wage
required by this subsection shall continue to be increased
pursuant to this subsection, but the higher federal rate
shall immediately become the minimum wage required by this
subsection and shall be increased or decreased per the
method set forth in subsection 2 for so long as it remains
higher than the state minimum wage required and increased
pursuant to this subsection.

SB 989 3
4. For purposes of this section, the term "public
employer" means an employer that is the state or a political
subdivision of the state, including a department, agency,
officer, bureau, division, board, commission, or
instrumentality of the state, or a city, county, town,
village, school district, or other political subdivision of
the state. [Beginning on August 28, 2025, the provisions]
Subsection 3 of this section shall not apply to a public
employer with respect to its employees. Any public employer
that is subject to subsections 1 and 2 of this section shall
continue to be subject to those subsections.
290.601. As used in sections 290.601 to 290.643:
(1) "Department", department of labor and industrial
relations;
(2) "Director", director of the department of labor
and industrial relations;
(3) "Domestic violence", as such term is defined in
section 455.010;
(4) "Earned paid sick time", time that is compensated
at the same hourly rate and with the same benefits,
including health care benefits, as the employee normally
earns during hours worked and is provided by an employer to
an employee for the purposes described in section 290.607,
but in no case shall this hourly amount be less than that
provided under section 290.502;
(5) "Employee", any individual employed in this state
by an employer, but does not include:
(a) Any individual engaged in the activities of an
educational, charitable, religious, or nonprofit
organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not, in fact, exist or where the services rendered to the
organization are on a voluntary basis;

SB 989 4
(b) Any individual standing in loco parentis to foster
children in their care;
(c) Any individual employed for less than four months
in any year in a resident or day camp for children or youth,
or any individual employed by an educational conference
center operated by an educational, charitable or not-for-
profit organization;
(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an
educational organization where employment by the
organization is in lieu of the requirement that the
individual pay the cost of tuition, housing or other
educational fees of the organization or where earnings of
the individual employed by the organization are credited
toward the payment of the cost of tuition, housing or other
educational fees of the organization;
(e) Any individual employed on or about a private
residence on an occasional basis for six hours or less on
each occasion;
(f) Any individual employed on a casual basis to
provide baby-sitting services;
(g) Any individual employed by an employer subject to
the provisions of Part A of Subtitle IV of Title 49, United
States Code, 49 U.S.C. Section 10101 et seq.;
(h) Any individual employed on a casual or
intermittent basis as a golf caddy, newsboy, or in a similar
occupation;
(i) Any individual who is employed in any government
position defined in 29 U.S.C. Section 203(e)(2)(C)(i)-(ii);
(j) Any individual employed by a retail or service
business whose annual gross volume sales made or business
done is less than five hundred thousand dollars;

SB 989 5
(k) Any individual who is an offender, as defined in
section 217.010, who is incarcerated in any correctional
facility operated by the department of corrections,
including offenders who provide labor or services on the
grounds of such correctional facility pursuant to section
217.550; or,
(l) Any individual described by the provisions of
section 29 U.S.C. 213(a)(8);
(6) "Employer", any person acting directly or
indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee; provided, however, that for the purposes of
sections 290.601 to 290.643 "employer" does not include the
United States government, the state, or a political
subdivision of the state, including a department, agency,
officer, bureau, division, board, commission, or
instrumentality of the state, or a city, county, town,
village, school district, public higher education
institution, or other political subdivision of the state;
(7) "Family member", any of the following individuals:
(a) Regardless of age, a biological, adopted or foster
child, stepchild or legal ward, a child of a domestic
partner, a child to whom the employee stands in loco
parentis, or an individual to whom the employee stood in
loco parentis when the individual was a minor;
(b) A biological, foster, stepparent or adoptive
parent or legal guardian of an employee or an employee's
spouse or domestic partner or an individual who stood in
loco parentis when the employee or employee's spouse or
domestic partner was a minor child;
(c) An individual to whom the employee is legally
married under the laws of any state, or a domestic partner
who is registered as such under the laws of any state or

SB 989 6
political subdivision, or an individual with whom the
employee is in a continuing social relationship of a
romantic or intimate nature;
(d) A grandparent, grandchild, or sibling (whether of
a biological, foster, adoptive or step relationship) of the
employee or the employee's spouse or domestic partner; or
(e) A person for whom the employee is responsible for
providing or arranging health or safety-related care,
including, but not limited to, helping that individual
obtain diagnostic, preventative, routine, or therapeutic
health treatment or ensuring the person is safe following
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
(8) "Health care professional", any individual
licensed under federal or any state law to provide medical
or emergency services, including, but not limited to,
100 doctors, nurses, certified nurse midwives, mental health
101 professionals, and emergency room personnel;
102 (9) "Person", any individual, partnership,
103 association, corporation, business, business trust, legal
104 representative, or any organized group of persons;
105 (10) "Retaliatory personnel action", denial of any
106 right guaranteed under sections 290.601 to 290.643, or any
107 threat, discharge, suspension, demotion, reduction of hours,
108 or any other adverse action against an employee for the
109 exercise of any right guaranteed herein. "Retaliatory
110 personnel action" shall also include interference with or
111 punishment for, in any manner, participating in or assisting
112 an investigation, proceeding, or hearing under sections
113 290.601 to 290.643;
114 (11) "Same hourly rate", means the following:

SB 989 7
115 (a) For employees paid on the basis of a single hourly
116 rate, the same hourly rate shall be the employee's regular
117 hourly rate;
118 (b) For employees who are paid multiple hourly rates
119 of pay from the same employer, the same hourly rate shall be
120 either:
121 a. The wages the employee would have been paid for the
122 hours absent during use of earned paid sick time if the
123 employee had worked; or
124 b. The weighted average of all hourly rates of pay
125 during the previous pay period.
126 Whatever method the employer uses, the employer must use a
127 consistent method for each employee throughout a year;
128 (c) For employees who are paid a salary, the same
129 hourly rate shall be determined by dividing the wages the
130 employee earns in the previous pay period by the total
131 number of hours worked during the previous pay period. For
132 determining total number of hours worked during the previous
133 pay period, employees who are exempt from overtime
134 requirements under 29 U.S.C. Section 213(a)(1), the Fair
135 Labor Standards Act, shall be assumed to work forty hours in
136 each work week unless their normal work week is less than
137 forty hours, in which case earned paid sick time shall
138 accrue and the same hourly rate shall be calculated based on
139 the employee's normal work week. Regardless of the basis
140 used, the same hourly rate shall not be less than the
141 effective minimum wage specified in section 290.502;
142 (d) For employees paid on a piece rate or a fee-for-
143 service basis, the same hourly rate shall be a reasonable
144 calculation of the wages or fees the employee would have
145 received for the piece work, service, or part thereof, if

SB 989 8
146 the employee had worked. Regardless of the basis used, the
147 same hourly rate shall not be less than the effective
148 minimum wage specified in section 290.502;
149 (e) For employees who are paid on a commission basis
150 (whether base wage plus commission or commission only), the
151 same hourly rate shall be the greater of the base wage or
152 the effective minimum wage specified in section 290.502;
153 (f) For employees who receive and retain compensation
154 in the form of gratuities in addition to wages, the same
155 hourly rate shall be the greater of the employee's regular
156 hourly rate or one hundred percent of the effective minimum
157 wage specified in section 290.502 without deduction of any
158 tips as a credit;
159 (12) "Sexual assault", as such term is defined in
160 section 455.010;
161 (13) "Stalking", as such term is defined in section
162 455.010;
163 (14) "Year", a regular and consecutive twelve-month
164 period as determined by the employer; except that for the
165 purposes of section 290.616 and section 290.628, "year"
166 shall mean a calendar year.
290.604. 1. Employees of an employer with fifteen or
more employees shall accrue a minimum of one hour of earned
paid sick time for every thirty hours worked, but such
employees shall not be entitled to use more than fifty-six
hours of earned paid sick time per year, unless the employer
selects a higher limit.
2. Employees of an employer with fewer than fifteen
employees shall accrue a minimum of one hour of earned paid
sick time for every thirty hours worked, but such employees
shall not be entitled to use more than forty hours of earned

SB 989 9
paid sick time per year, unless the employer selects a
higher limit.
3. In determining the number of employees of an
employer, all employees performing work in the state for an
employer for compensation on a full-time, part-time, or
temporary basis shall be counted. In situations in which
the number of employees performing work in the state for an
employer for compensation per week fluctuates above and
below fifteen employees per week over the course of a year,
an employer is required to provide earned paid sick time
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section if it maintained
fifteen or more employees in the state on the payroll for
some portion of a working day in each of twenty or more
different calendar weeks, including any periods of leave,
and whether or not the weeks were consecutive, in either the
current or the preceding year (irrespective of whether the
same individuals were in employment in each working day).
4. All employees shall accrue earned paid sick time as
follows:
(1) Earned paid sick time as provided in this section
shall begin to accrue at the commencement of employment or
January 1, 2027, whichever is later. An employee shall be
entitled to use earned paid sick time as it is accrued. An
employer may provide all earned paid sick time that an
employee is expected to accrue in a year at the beginning of
the year;
(2) Employees who are exempt from overtime
requirements under 29 U.S.C. Section 213(a)(1) of the
Federal Fair Labor Standards Act will be assumed to work
forty hours in each work week for purposes of earned paid
sick time accrual unless their normal work week is less than

SB 989 10
forty hours, in which case earned paid sick time accrues
based upon that normal work week;
(3) Up to eighty hours of earned paid sick time shall
be carried over to the following year if the employee has
any unused accrued earned paid sick time at the end of the
year, but this law does not require an employer to permit an
employee to use more than the applicable number of hours of
earned paid sick time per year as set forth in subsections 1
and 2 of this section. Alternatively, in lieu of carryover
of unused earned paid sick time from one year to the next,
an employer may pay an employee for unused earned paid sick
time at the end of a year which could be carried over and
provide the employee with an amount of paid sick time that
meets or exceeds the requirements of sections 290.601 to
290.643 that is available for the employee's immediate use
at the beginning of the subsequent year;
(4) If an employee is transferred to a separate
division, entity, or location, but remains employed by the
same employer, the employee is entitled to all earned paid
sick time accrued at the prior division, entity, or location
and is entitled to use all earned paid sick time as provided
in this section. When there is a separation from employment
and the employee is rehired within nine months of separation
by the same employer, previously accrued earned paid sick
time that had not been used shall be reinstated. Further,
the employee shall be entitled to use accrued earned paid
sick time and accrue additional earned paid sick time at the
recommencement of employment;
(5) When a different employer succeeds or takes the
place of an existing employer, all employees of the original
employer who remain employed by the successor employer are
entitled to all earned paid sick time they accrued when

SB 989 11
employed by the original employer, and are entitled to use
earned paid sick time previously accrued;
(6) At its discretion, an employer may loan earned
paid sick time to an employee in advance of accrual by such
employee.
5. Any employer with a paid leave policy, such as a
paid time off policy, who makes available an amount of paid
leave sufficient to meet the accrual requirements of this
section that may be used for the same purposes and under the
same conditions as earned paid sick time under sections
290.601 to 290.643 is not required to provide additional
paid sick time under this section.
6. Except as specifically provided in this section,
nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring
financial or other reimbursement to an employee from an
employer upon the employee's termination, resignation,
retirement, or other separation from employment for accrued
earned paid sick time that has not been used.
7. Employees shall not accrue earned paid sick time
before January 1, 2027. Employees who are employed or who
commence employment on or after January 1, 2027, shall
accrue earned paid sick time and be entitled to use earned
paid sick time as it is accrued in accordance with sections
290.601 to 290.643. The department may develop model
posters and notices, engage in rulemaking, initiate outreach
programs, and engage in other activities for implementation
100 of the provisions of sections 290.601 to 290.643 as
101 authorized by those sections before January 1, 2027.
290.605. 1. For purposes of this section, the term
"earned paid bereavement time" means time that is
compensated at the same hourly rate and with the same
benefits, including health care benefits, as the employee

SB 989 12
normally earns during hours worked and is provided by an
employer to an employee for the purposes described in
section 290.607, but in no case shall this hourly amount be
less than that provided under section 290.502, that is taken
in connection with the death of a family member or for the
grieving of a reproductive loss. "Reproductive loss"
includes a miscarriage, an unsuccessful round of
intrauterine insemination or of an assisted reproductive
technology procedure, a failed adoption match or an adoption
that is not finalized because it is contested by another
party, a failed surrogacy agreement, a diagnosis that
negatively impacts pregnancy or fertility, or a stillbirth.
2. Employees of an employer with fifteen or more
employees shall accrue a minimum of one hour of earned paid
bereavement time for every thirty hours worked, but such
employees shall not be entitled to use more than fifty-six
hours of earned paid bereavement time per year, unless the
employer selects a higher limit.
3. Employees of an employer with fewer than fifteen
employees shall accrue a minimum of one hour of earned paid
bereavement time for every thirty hours worked, but such
employees shall not be entitled to use more than forty hours
of earned paid bereavement time per year, unless the
employer selects a higher limit.
4. In determining the number of employees of an
employer, all employees performing work in the state for an
employer for compensation on a full-time, part-time, or
temporary basis shall be counted. In situations in which
the number of employees performing work in the state for an
employer for compensation per week fluctuates above and
below fifteen employees per week over the course of a year,
an employer is required to provide earned paid bereavement

SB 989 13
time pursuant to subsection 2 of this section if it
maintained fifteen or more employees in the state on the
payroll for some portion of a working day in each of twenty
or more different calendar weeks, including any periods of
leave, and whether or not the weeks were consecutive, in
either the current or the preceding year, irrespective of
whether the same individuals were in employment in each
working day.
5. All employees shall accrue earned paid bereavement
time as follows:
(1) Earned paid bereavement time as provided in this
section shall begin to accrue at the commencement of
employment or January 1, 2027, whichever is later. An
employee shall be entitled to use earned paid bereavement
time as it is accrued. An employer may provide all earned
paid bereavement time that an employee is expected to accrue
in a year at the beginning of the year;
(2) Employees who are exempt from overtime
requirements under 29 U.S.C. Section 213(a)(1) of the
Federal Fair Labor Standards Act will be assumed to work
forty hours in each work week for purposes of earned paid
bereavement time accrual unless their normal work week is
less than forty hours, in which case earned paid bereavement
time accrues based upon that normal work week;
(3) Up to eighty hours of earned paid bereavement time
shall be carried over to the following year if the employee
has any unused accrued earned paid bereavement time at the
end of the year, but this section does not require an
employer to permit an employee to use more than the
applicable number of hours of earned paid bereavement time
per year as set forth in subsections 2 and 3 of this
section. Alternatively, in lieu of carryover of unused

SB 989 14
earned paid bereavement time from one year to the next, an
employer may pay an employee for unused earned paid
bereavement time at the end of a year which could be carried
over and provide the employee with an amount of paid
bereavement time that meets or exceeds the requirements of
sections 290.601 to 290.643 that is available for the
employee's immediate use at the beginning of the subsequent
year;
(4) If an employee is transferred to a separate
division, entity, or location, but remains employed by the
same employer, the employee is entitled to all earned paid
bereavement time accrued at the prior division, entity, or
location and is entitled to use all earned paid bereavement
time as provided in this section. When there is a
separation from employment and the employee is rehired
within nine months of separation by the same employer,
previously accrued earned paid bereavement time that had not
been used shall be reinstated. Further, the employee shall
be entitled to use accrued earned paid bereavement time and
accrue additional earned paid bereavement time at the
recommencement of employment;
(5) When a different employer succeeds or takes the
place of an existing employer, all employees of the original
employer who remain employed by the successor employer are
entitled to all earned paid bereavement time they accrued
when employed by the original employer, and are entitled to
use earned paid bereavement time previously accrued;
(6) At its discretion, an employer may loan earned
paid bereavement time to an employee in advance of accrual
by such employee;

SB 989 15
(7) Earned paid bereavement leave shall be taken
100 within ninety calendar days of the family member's death or
101 of the event resulting in reproductive loss.
102 6. Any employer with a bereavement policy who makes
103 available an amount of paid bereavement leave sufficient to
104 meet the accrual requirements of this section that may be
105 used for the same purposes and under the same conditions as
106 under this section is not required to provide additional
107 paid bereavement time under this section.
108 7. Except as specifically provided in this section,
109 nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring
110 financial or other reimbursement to an employee from an
111 employer upon the employee's termination, resignation,
112 retirement, or other separation from employment for accrued
113 earned bereavement paid sick time that has not been used.
114 8. Employees shall not accrue earned bereavement paid
115 sick time before January 1, 2027. Employees who are
116 employed or who commence employment on or after January 1,
117 2027, shall accrue earned bereavement paid sick time and be
118 entitled to use earned bereavement paid sick time as it is
119 accrued in accordance with sections 290.601 to 290.643.
290.607. 1. Earned paid sick time shall be provided
to an employee by an employer for:
(1) An employee's mental or physical illness, injury,
or health condition; an employee's need for medical
diagnosis, care, or treatment of a mental or physical
illness, injury, or health condition; an employee's need for
preventative medical care;
(2) Care of a family member with a mental or physical
illness, injury, or health condition; care of a family
member who needs medical diagnosis, care, or treatment of a

SB 989 16
mental or physical illness, injury, or health condition;
care of a family member who needs preventative medical care;
(3) Closure of the employee's place of business by
order of a public official due to a public health emergency,
or an employee's need to care for a child whose school or
place of care has been closed by order of a public official
due to a public health emergency, or care for oneself or a
family member when it has been determined by the health
authorities having jurisdiction or by a health care provider
that the employee's or family member's presence in the
community may jeopardize the health of others because of his
or her exposure to a communicable disease, whether or not
the employee or family member has actually contracted the
communicable disease; or
(4) Absence necessary due to domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking, provided the leave is to allow the
employee to obtain for the employee or the employee's family
member:
(a) Medical attention needed to recover from physical
or psychological injury or disability caused by domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
(b) Services from a victim services organization;
(c) Psychological or other counseling;
(d) Relocation or taking steps to secure an existing
home due to the domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking; or
(e) Legal services, including preparing for or
participating in any civil or criminal legal proceeding
related to or resulting from the domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking.
2. Earned paid sick time shall be provided upon the
request of an employee. Such request may be made orally, in

SB 989 17
writing, by electronic means, or by any other means
acceptable to the employer. When possible, the request
shall include the expected duration of the absence.
3. When the use of earned paid sick time is
foreseeable, the employee shall make a good faith effort to
provide notice of the need for such time to the employer in
advance of the use of the earned paid sick time and shall
make a reasonable effort to schedule the use of earned paid
sick time in a manner that does not unduly disrupt the
operations of the employer. Where such need is not
foreseeable, an employer may require an employee to provide
notice of the need for the use of earned paid sick time as
soon as practicable.
4. An employer that requires notice of the need to use
earned paid sick time where the need is not foreseeable
shall provide a written policy that contains procedures for
the employee to provide notice. An employer that has not
provided to the employee a copy of its written policy for
providing such notice shall not deny earned paid sick time
to the employee based on noncompliance with such a policy.
5. An employer may not require, as a condition of an
employee's taking earned paid sick time, that the employee
search for or find a replacement worker to cover the hours
during which the employee is using earned paid sick time.
6. Earned paid sick time may be used in the smaller of
hourly increments or the smallest increment that the
employer's payroll system uses to account for absences or
use of other time.
7. For earned paid sick time of three or more
consecutive work days, an employer may require reasonable
documentation that the earned paid sick time has been used
for a purpose covered by subsection 1 of this section.

SB 989 18
(1) Documentation signed by a heath care professional
indicating that earned paid sick time is necessary shall be
considered reasonable documentation for purposes of this
section.
(2) In cases of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking, if the employer requests, one of the following
types of documentation selected by the employee shall be
considered reasonable documentation:
(a) A police report indicating that the employee or
the employee's family member was a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
(b) A written statement from an employee or agent of a
victim service provider affirming that the employee or
employee's family member is or was receiving services from a
victim service provider;
(c) Documentation signed by a health care professional
from whom the employee or employee's family member sought
assistance relating to domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking or the effects thereof;
(d) A court document indicating that an employee or
employee's family member is or was involved in a legal
action related to domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking; or
(e) A written statement from the employee affirming
that the employee or employee's family member is taking or
100 took earned paid sick time for a qualifying purpose of
101 subsection 1 of this section.
102 (3) An employer may not require that the documentation
103 explain the nature of the illness, details of the underlying
104 health needs, or the details of the domestic violence,
105 sexual assault, or stalking, unless otherwise required by
106 law.

SB 989 19
290.609. 1. It shall be unlawful for an employer or
any other person to interfere with, restrain, or deny the
exercise of, or the attempt to exercise, any right protected
under sections 290.601 to 290.643.
2. An employer shall not take retaliatory personnel
action or discriminate against an employee or former
employee because the individual has exercised rights
protected under sections 290.601 to 290.643. Such rights
include, but are not limited to, the right to request or use
earned paid sick time or earned bereavement time pursuant to
sections 290.601 to 290.643; the right to file a complaint
or inform any person about any employer's alleged violation
of sections 290.601 to 290.643; the right to participate in
any investigation, hearing, or proceeding or cooperate with
or assist the department in any investigations of alleged
violations of sections 290.601 to 290.643; and the right to
inform any person of his or her potential rights under
sections 290.601 to 290.643.
3. It shall be unlawful for an employer's absence
control policy to count earned paid sick time or earned
bereavement time taken under sections 290.601 to 290.643 as
an absence that may lead to or result in discipline,
discharge, demotion, suspension, or any other adverse action.
4. Protections of this section shall apply to any
individual who mistakenly but in good faith alleges
violations of sections 290.601 to 290.643.
290.610. 1. It shall be unlawful for an employer or
any other person to interfere with, restrain, or deny the
exercise of, or the attempt to exercise, any right protected
under sections 290.601 to 290.643.
2. An employer shall not take retaliatory personnel
action or discriminate against an employee or former

SB 989 20
employee because the individual has exercised rights
protected under sections 290.601 to 290.643. Such rights
include, but are not limited to, the right to request or use
earned paid sick time pursuant to sections 290.601 to
290.643; the right to file a complaint or inform any person
about any employer's alleged violation of sections 290.601
to 290.643; the right to participate in any investigation,
hearing, or proceeding or cooperate with or assist the
department in any investigations of alleged violations of
sections 290.601 to 290.643; and the right to inform any
person of his or her potential rights under sections 290.601
to 290.643.
3. It shall be unlawful for an employer's absence
control policy to count earned paid sick time taken under
sections 290.601 to 290.643 as an absence that may lead to
or result in discipline, discharge, demotion, suspension, or
any other adverse action.
4. Protections of this section shall apply to any
individual who mistakenly but in good faith alleges
violations of sections 290.601 to 290.643.
290.612. 1. Employers shall give employees a written
notice about earned paid sick time and earned paid
bereavement time within fourteen calendar days of the
commencement of employment or on April 15, 2027, whichever
is later, which must include the following information:
(1) Beginning May 1, 2027, employees accrue and are
entitled to earned paid sick time at the rate one hour of
earned paid sick time for every thirty hours of work, and
may use earned paid sick time, subject to the limits and
terms under sections 290.601 to 290.643 of Missouri law;
(2) It is prohibited for an employer to take
retaliatory personnel action against employees who request

SB 989 21
or use earned paid sick time or earned paid bereavement time
as allowed by law;
(3) Each employee has the right to bring a civil
action if earned paid sick time or earned paid bereavement
time as required by sections 290.601 to 290.643 is denied by
the employer or the employee is subjected to retaliatory
personnel action by the employer for exercising the
employee's rights under sections 290.601 to 290.643; and
(4) The contact information for the department.
Notice shall be provided by the employer to the employee on
a single piece of paper, at least 8.5 x 11, in no less than
14-point font.
2. Beginning April 15, 2027, employers shall display a
poster that contains the information required in subsection
1 of this section in a conspicuous and accessible place in
each establishment where such employees are employed,
provided that such poster has been made available by the
department.
3. The department may create and make available to
employers, model notices and posters that contain the
information required under subsection 1 of this section for
employers' use in complying with subsections 1 and 2 of this
section. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted or
applied, either expressly or through practical necessity, to
require the department to create or make available notices
or posters if it requires the appropriation of funds to
cover the costs of such acts.
290.613. 1. Employers shall give employees a written
notice about earned paid sick time within fourteen calendar
days of the commencement of employment or on December 15,

SB 989 22
2026, whichever is later, which must include the following
information:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, employees accrue and
are entitled to earned paid sick time at the rate one hour
of earned paid sick time for every thirty hours of work, and
may use earned paid sick time, subject to the limits and
terms under sections 290.601 to 290.643 of Missouri law;
(2) It is prohibited for an employer to take
retaliatory personnel action against employees who request
or use earned paid sick time as allowed by law;
(3) Each employee has the right to bring a civil
action if earned paid sick time as required by sections
290.601 to 290.643 is denied by the employer or the employee
is subjected to retaliatory personnel action by the employer
for exercising the employee's rights under sections 290.601
to 290.643; and
(4) The contact information for the department.
Notice shall be provided by the employer to the employee on
a single piece of paper, at least 8.5 x 11, in no less than
14-point font.
2. Beginning December 15, 2026, employers shall
display a poster that contains the information required in
subsection 1 of this section in a conspicuous and accessible
place in each establishment where such employees are
employed, provided that such poster has been made available
by the department.
3. The department may create and make available to
employers, model notices and posters that contain the
information required under subsection 1 of this section for
employers' use in complying with subsections 1 and 2 of this
section. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted or

SB 989 23
applied, either expressly or through practical necessity, to
require the department to create or make available notices
or posters if it requires the appropriation of funds to
cover the costs of such acts.
290.615. 1. Employers shall retain records
documenting hours worked by employees and earned paid sick
time and earned paid bereavement time taken by employees,
for a period of not less than three years, and shall allow
the department access to such records, with appropriate
notice and at a mutually agreeable time, to monitor
compliance with the requirements of sections 290.601 to
290.643.
2. To the extent permitted by law, the director may
inspect such records, and the records shall be open for
inspection by the director by appointment. Where the
records required under this section are kept outside the
state, the records shall be made available to the director
upon demand. Every such employer shall furnish to the
director on demand a sworn statement of time records and
information upon forms prescribed or approved by the
director. All the records and information obtained by the
department are confidential and shall be disclosed only on
order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
3. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or
applied, either expressly or through practical necessity, to
require the department or director to access or inspect
records or to create forms relating to the inspection of
records if it requires the appropriation of funds to cover
the costs of such acts.
290.616. 1. Employers shall retain records
documenting hours worked by employees and earned paid sick
time taken by employees, for a period of not less than three

SB 989 24
years, and shall allow the department access to such
records, with appropriate notice and at a mutually agreeable
time, to monitor compliance with the requirements of
sections 290.601 to 290.643.
2. To the extent permitted by law, the director may
inspect such records, and the records shall be open for
inspection by the director by appointment. Where the
records required under this section are kept outside the
state, the records shall be made available to the director
upon demand. Every such employer shall furnish to the
director on demand a sworn statement of time records and
information upon forms prescribed or approved by the
director. All the records and information obtained by the
department are confidential and shall be disclosed only on
order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
3. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or
applied, either expressly or through practical necessity, to
require the department or director to access or inspect
records or to create forms relating to the inspection of
records if it requires the appropriation of funds to cover
the costs of such acts.
290.619. 1. The department may, in accordance with
chapter 536, promulgate rules for the implementation,
enforcement, and administration of sections 290.601 to
290.643. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective

SB 989 25
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
effective date of this act, shall be invalid and void.
2. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or
applied, either expressly or through practical necessity, to
require the promulgation or adoption of rules if it requires
the appropriation of funds to cover the costs of such acts.
290.621. 1. The department may investigate and
ascertain compliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643,
establish and implement a system to receive complaints
regarding noncompliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643 and
to investigate and attempt to resolve complaints between the
complainant and the subject of the complaint, and establish
additional means of enforcement, including requiring by
subpoena the testimony of witnesses and production of books,
records, and other evidence relative to any matter under
investigation or hearing, issuing notices of violation,
holding hearings on notices of violation, making
determinations, recovering unpaid earned sick time,
recovering unpaid earned bereavement time, and imposing
fines for willful violations of up to five hundred dollars
per day of each day of a continuing violation. A final
decision of the department is subject to review in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 536.
2. The department may develop and implement an
outreach program to inform employees, parents, and persons
who are under the care of a health care provider about the
availability of earned paid sick time and earned paid
bereavement time under sections 290.601 to 290.643. This
program may include the distribution of notices and other
written materials to child care and elder care providers,

SB 989 26
domestic violence shelters, schools, hospitals, community
health centers, and other health care providers in Missouri.
3. A municipality, county, city, town, or village may
adopt ordinances, rules, and regulations to investigate and
ascertain compliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643,
establish and implement a system to receive complaints
regarding noncompliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643 and
to investigate and attempt to resolve complaints between the
complainant and the subject of the complaint, and establish
additional means of enforcement, with respect to employers
within, or employees performing work while physically
present in, the geographic boundaries of the municipality,
county, city, town, or village. Any such ordinance, rule,
or regulation shall be consistent with this law and any
department rules or regulations and system for compliance
and enforcement. The municipality, county, city, town, or
village may exercise such powers as allowed by any
applicable charter or ordinance, including requiring by
subpoena the testimony of witnesses and production of books,
records, and other evidence relative to any matter under
investigation or hearing, issuing notices of violation,
holding hearings on notices of violation, making
determinations, recovering unpaid earned sick time,
recovering unpaid earned bereavement time, and imposing
fines for willful violations of up to the maximum allowed
for an ordinance violation. Before investigating or seeking
to resolve any complaint between the complainant and the
subject of the complaint, the municipality, county, city,
town, or village shall give notice to the department with a
copy of the complaint and, within fourteen days of such
notice, the department may intervene as of right and
participate in the matter to ensure that the complaint is

SB 989 27
being investigated and resolved in the interest of effective
enforcement of sections 290.601 to 290.643 or,
alternatively, the department may institute its own
proceedings in which case the municipality, county, city,
town, or village shall refrain from acting on the matter so
long as the complaint is being investigated and resolved in
the interest of effective enforcement of sections 290.601 to
290.643. If the department does not, within fourteen days,
intervene or instigate its own proceedings, the
municipality, county, city, town, or village may, without
the department, investigate and attempt to resolve the
complaint and take other additional means within its power
to enforce sections 290.601 to 290.643 against the subject
of the complaint. In no event shall an employer be subject
to compliance proceedings arising out of a single set of
facts after having already been subjected to a final
compliance order by another governmental entity.
4. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or
applied, either expressly or through practical necessity, to
require the department, a municipality, county, city, town,
or village to conduct investigations and ascertain
compliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643, to establish
and implement a system to receive or resolve complaints, to
establish additional means of enforcement, or to conduct
outreach and education, including the creation of notices
and other written materials, concerning sections 290.601 to
290.643, if it requires the appropriation of funds to cover
the costs of such acts.
290.622. 1. The department may investigate and
ascertain compliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643,
establish and implement a system to receive complaints
regarding noncompliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643 and

SB 989 28
to investigate and attempt to resolve complaints between the
complainant and the subject of the complaint, and establish
additional means of enforcement, including requiring by
subpoena the testimony of witnesses and production of books,
records, and other evidence relative to any matter under
investigation or hearing, issuing notices of violation,
holding hearings on notices of violation, making
determinations, recovering unpaid earned sick time, and
imposing fines for willful violations of up to five hundred
dollars per day of each day of a continuing violation. A
final decision of the department is subject to review in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 536.
2. The department may develop and implement an
outreach program to inform employees, parents, and persons
who are under the care of a health care provider about the
availability of earned paid sick time under sections 290.601
to 290.643. This program may include the distribution of
notices and other written materials to child care and elder
care providers, domestic violence shelters, schools,
hospitals, community health centers, and other health care
providers in Missouri.
3. A municipality, county, city, town, or village may
adopt ordinances, rules, and regulations to investigate and
ascertain compliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643,
establish and implement a system to receive complaints
regarding noncompliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643 and
to investigate and attempt to resolve complaints between the
complainant and the subject of the complaint, and establish
additional means of enforcement, with respect to employers
within, or employees performing work while physically
present in, the geographic boundaries of the municipality,
county, city, town, or village. Any such ordinance, rule,

SB 989 29
or regulation shall be consistent with this law and any
department rules or regulations and system for compliance
and enforcement. The municipality, county, city, town, or
village may exercise such powers as allowed by any
applicable charter or ordinance, including requiring by
subpoena the testimony of witnesses and production of books,
records, and other evidence relative to any matter under
investigation or hearing, issuing notices of violation,
holding hearings on notices of violation, making
determinations, recovering unpaid earned sick time, and
imposing fines for willful violations of up to the maximum
allowed for an ordinance violation. Before investigating or
seeking to resolve any complaint between the complainant and
the subject of the complaint, the municipality, county,
city, town, or village shall give notice to the department
with a copy of the complaint and, within fourteen days of
such notice, the department may intervene as of right and
participate in the matter to ensure that the complaint is
being investigated and resolved in the interest of effective
enforcement of sections 290.601 to 290.643 or,
alternatively, the department may institute its own
proceedings in which case the municipality, county, city,
town, or village shall refrain from acting on the matter so
long as the complaint is being investigated and resolved in
the interest of effective enforcement of sections 290.601 to
290.643. If the department does not, within fourteen days,
intervene or instigate its own proceedings, the
municipality, county, city, town, or village may, without
the department, investigate and attempt to resolve the
complaint and take other additional means within its power
to enforce sections 290.601 to 290.643 against the subject
of the complaint. In no event shall an employer be subject

SB 989 30
to compliance proceedings arising out of a single set of
facts after having already been subjected to a final
compliance order by another governmental entity.
4. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or
applied, either expressly or through practical necessity, to
require the department, a municipality, county, city, town,
or village to conduct investigations and ascertain
compliance with sections 290.601 to 290.643, to establish
and implement a system to receive or resolve complaints, to
establish additional means of enforcement, or to conduct
outreach and education, including the creation of notices
and other written materials, concerning sections 290.601 to
290.643, if it requires the appropriation of funds to cover
the costs of such acts.
290.625. 1. Any employer who willfully violates or
fails to comply with any of the provisions and requirements
of sections 290.601 to 290.643 shall be guilty of a class C
misdemeanor; provided, however, that an employer who
willfully violates the notice and posting requirements of
section 290.613 shall be guilty of an infraction.
2. For purposes of this section, each day of violation
or failure to comply and each employee affected shall
constitute a separate offense.
290.627. 1. Any individual who claims to have been
aggrieved by a failure of an employer to comply with any
portion of sections 290.601 to 290.643, including, but not
limited to, the failure to provide earned paid sick time or
earned paid bereavement time or to allow employees to use
such time consistent with sections 290.601 to 290.643, or
who claims to have suffered a retaliatory personnel action,
shall have a right of action and may commence a civil action
in the appropriate court of jurisdiction within three years

SB 989 31
of the accrual of the cause of action, to obtain appropriate
relief with respect to such unlawful violation. Such action
may be brought without first filing an administrative
complaint.
2. In a civil action under this section, if the court
finds a violation has occurred, the court may grant as
relief, as it deems appropriate and to the extent permitted
by law, any permanent or temporary injunction, the full
amount of any unpaid earned sick time or unpaid bereavement
time plus any actual damages suffered as the result of the
employer's violation of sections 290.601 to 290.643, an
additional amount equal to twice any unpaid earned sick time
as liquidated damages, costs, and reasonable attorney's fees
as may be allowed by the court, and other legal or equitable
relief as may be appropriate to remedy the violation,
including, without limitation, reinstatement to employment
and back pay.
290.628. 1. Any individual who claims to have been
aggrieved by a failure of an employer to comply with any
portion of sections 290.601 to 290.643, including, but not
limited to, the failure to provide earned paid sick time or
to allow employees to use such time consistent with sections
290.601 to 290.643, or who claims to have suffered a
retaliatory personnel action, shall have a right of action
and may commence a civil action in the appropriate court of
jurisdiction within three years of the accrual of the cause
of action, to obtain appropriate relief with respect to such
unlawful violation. Such action may be brought without
first filing an administrative complaint.
2. In a civil action under this section, if the court
finds a violation has occurred, the court may grant as
relief, as it deems appropriate and to the extent permitted

SB 989 32
by law, any permanent or temporary injunction, the full
amount of any unpaid earned sick time plus any actual
damages suffered as the result of the employer's violation
of sections 290.601 to 290.643, an additional amount equal
to twice any unpaid earned sick time as liquidated damages,
costs, and reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by
the court, and other legal or equitable relief as may be
appropriate to remedy the violation, including, without
limitation, reinstatement to employment and back pay.
290.630. 1. Except as otherwise required by law, an
employer may not require disclosure of details relating to
an employee's or an employee's family member's health
information, domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking
as a condition of providing earned paid sick time or earned
paid bereavement time under sections 290.601 to 290.643.
2. Unless as otherwise required by law, any health or
safety information possessed by an employer regarding an
employee or employee's family member must:
(1) Be maintained on a separate form and in a separate
file from other personnel information;
(2) Be treated as confidential medical records; and
(3) Not be disclosed except to the affected employee
or with the express written permission of the affected
employee.
290.631. 1. Except as otherwise required by law, an
employer may not require disclosure of details relating to
an employee's or an employee's family member's health
information, domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking
as a condition of providing earned paid sick time under
sections 290.601 to 290.643.

SB 989 33
2. Unless as otherwise required by law, any health or
safety information possessed by an employer regarding an
employee or employee's family member must:
(1) Be maintained on a separate form and in a separate
file from other personnel information;
(2) Be treated as confidential medical records; and
(3) Not be disclosed except to the affected employee
or with the express written permission of the affected
employee.
290.633. 1. With respect to employees covered by a
valid collective bargaining agreement in effect on November
5, 2024, no provisions of sections 290.601 to 290.643 shall
apply until the stated expiration date in the collective
bargaining agreement; however, further the provisions of
sections 290.601 to 290.643 shall apply upon any such
agreement's renewal, extension, amendment, or modification
in any respect after November 5, 2024.
2. Nothing in sections 290.601 to 290.643 shall be
deemed to interfere, impede, or otherwise diminish the right
of employees to bargain collectively through representatives
of their own choosing in order to establish earned paid sick
time, earned paid bereavement time, or other conditions of
work in excess of the applicable minimum standards under the
provisions of sections 290.601 to 290.643.
3. Any waiver by an employee of rights under sections
290.601 to 290.643 shall be deemed contrary to public policy
and shall be void.
290.634. 1. With respect to employees covered by a
valid collective bargaining agreement in effect on November
5, 2024, no provisions of sections 290.601 through 290.643
shall apply until the stated expiration date in the
collective bargaining agreement; however, further the

SB 989 34
provisions of sections 290.601 through 290.643 shall apply
upon any such agreement's renewal, extension, amendment, or
modification in any respect after November 5, 2024.
2. Nothing in sections 290.601 through 290.643 shall
be deemed to interfere, impede, or otherwise diminish the
right of employees to bargain collectively through
representatives of their own choosing in order to establish
earned paid sick time or other conditions of work in excess
of the applicable minimum standards under the provisions of
sections 290.601 through 290.643.
3. Any waiver by an employee of rights under sections
290.601 through 290.643 shall be deemed contrary to public
policy and shall be void.
290.636. 1. Nothing in sections 290.601 to 290.643
shall be construed to discourage or prohibit an employer
from the adoption or retention of an earned paid sick time
policy, or earned paid bereavement time policy, or both,
that is more generous than the one required herein.
2. Nothing in sections 290.601 to 290.643 shall be
construed as diminishing the obligation of an employer to
comply with any contract, collective bargaining agreement,
employment benefit plan, or other agreement providing more
generous paid sick time or earned paid bereavement time to
an employee than required herein. Nothing in sections
290.601 to 290.643 shall be construed as diminishing the
rights of public employees regarding paid sick time or
earned paid bereavement time or use of paid sick time or
earned paid bereavement time as provided in the laws of
Missouri and ordinances of political subdivisions pertaining
to public employees.
290.637. 1. Nothing in sections 290.601 through
290.643 shall be construed to discourage or prohibit an

SB 989 35
employer from the adoption or retention of an earned paid
sick time policy more generous than the one required herein.
2. Nothing in sections 290.601 through 290.643 shall
be construed as diminishing the obligation of an employer to
comply with any contract, collective bargaining agreement,
employment benefit plan, or other agreement providing more
generous paid sick time to an employee than required
herein. Nothing in sections 290.601 through 290.643 shall
be construed as diminishing the rights of public employees
regarding paid sick time or use of paid sick time as
provided in the laws of Missouri and ordinances of political
subdivisions pertaining to public employees.
290.639. 1. Sections 290.601 to 290.643 provide
minimum requirements pertaining to earned paid sick time and
earned paid bereavement time and shall not be construed to
preempt, limit, or otherwise affect the applicability of any
other law, regulation, requirement, policy, or standard that
provides for greater accrual or use by employees of earned
paid sick time and earned paid bereavement time or that
extends other protections to employees.
2. Nothing in sections 290.601 to 290.643 shall be
interpreted or applied to create a power or obligation
contrary to any federal law, rule, or regulation.
290.640. 1. Sections 290.601 through 290.643 provide
minimum requirements pertaining to earned paid sick time and
shall not be construed to preempt, limit, or otherwise
affect the applicability of any other law, regulation,
requirement, policy, or standard that provides for greater
accrual or use by employees of earned paid sick time or that
extends other protections to employees.

SB 989 36
2. Nothing in sections 290.601 through 290.643 shall
be interpreted or applied to create a power or obligation
contrary to any federal law, rule, or regulation.
290.643. Except as detailed in section 290.619, all of
the provisions of sections 290.601 through 290.643 are
severable, and if any provision, including any section,
subsection, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, or clause, or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is
found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid,
unconstitutional, or unconstitutionally enacted, such
decision shall not affect other provisions or applications
of sections 290.601 through 290.643 that can be given effect
without the invalid, unconstitutional, or unconstitutionally
enacted provision or application, and to this end the
provisions of sections 290.601 through 290.643 are declared
severable.
✓